Utah statutes.
41-3-204.   Licenses -- Principal place of business as prerequisite -- Change of location -- Relinquishment on loss of principal place of business.

(1) (a)  The following licensees must maintain a principal place of business:

(i)  dealers;

(ii)  special equipment dealers;

(iii)  manufacturers;

(iv)  transporters;

(v)  remanufacturers;

(vi)  dismantlers;

(vii)  crushers;

(viii)  body shops; and

(ix)  distributors who:

(A)  are located within the state; or

(B)  have a branch office within the state.

(b)  The administrator may not issue a license under Subsection (1)(a) to an applicant who does not have a principal place of business.

(c)  If a licensee changes the location of his principal place of business, he shall immediately notify the administrator and a new license shall be granted for the unexpired portion of the term of the original license at no additional fee.

(2) (a)  If a licensee loses possession of a principal place of business, the license is automatically suspended and he shall immediately notify the administrator and upon demand by the administrator deliver the license, pocket cards, special plates, and temporary permits to the administrator.

(b)  The administrator shall hold the licenses, cards, plates, and permits until the licensee obtains a principal place of business.



Amended by Chapter 388, 2008 General Session

